California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(3) The licensee shall keep the executed application and acknowledgment on the premises at all times and available for inspection by the department. A licensee with more than one licensed off-sale premises in the state may comply with this subdivision by maintaining an executed application and acknowledgment at a designated licensed premises, regional office, or headquarters office in the state. An executed application and acknowledgment maintained at the designated locations shall be valid for all licensed off-sale premises owned by the licensee. Any licensee maintaining an application and acknowledgment at a designated site other than the individual licensed off-sale premises shall notify the department in advance and in writing of the site where the application and acknowledgment shall be
 maintained and available for inspection. A licensee electing to maintain an application and acknowledgments at a designated site other than the licensed premises shall maintain at each licensed premises a notice of where the executed application and acknowledgments are located. Any licensee with more than one licensed off-sale premises who elects to maintain the application and acknowledgments at a designated site other than each licensed premises shall provide the department, upon written demand, a copy of any employee’s executed application and acknowledgment within 10 business days. A violation of this subdivision by a licensee constitutes grounds for discipline by the department.

(b) The licensee shall post a notice that contains and describes, in concise terms, prohibited sales of alcoholic beverages, a statement that the off-sale seller will refuse to make a sale if the seller reasonably suspects that the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act
 may be violated. The notice shall be posted at an entrance or at a point of sale in the licensed premises or in any other location that is visible to purchasers of alcoholic beverages and to the off-sale seller.

(c) A retail licensee shall post a notice that contains and describes, in concise terms, the fines and penalties for any violation of Section 25658, relating to the sale of alcoholic beverages to, or the purchase of alcoholic beverages by, any person under 21 years of age.

(d) Nonprofit organizations or licensees may obtain video recordings and other training materials from the department on the Licensee Education on Alcohol and Drugs (LEAD) program. The video recordings and training materials may be updated periodically and may be provided in English and other languages, and when made available by the department, shall be provided at cost.

(e) As used in this section:

(1) “Off-sale seller” means any person holding a retail off-sale license issued by the department and any person employed by that licensee who in the course of that employment sells alcoholic beverages.

(2) “Clerk” means an off-sale seller who is not a licensee.

(f) The department may adopt rules and appropriate fees for licensees that it determines necessary for the administration of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 505, Sec. 2.   (SB 485)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

25658.5.

(a) Any person under 21 years of age who attempts to purchase any alcoholic beverage from a licensee, or the licensee’s agent or employee, is guilty of an infraction and shall be punished by a fine of not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250), or the person shall be required to perform not less than 24 hours or more than 32 hours of community service during hours when the person is not employed or is not attending school, or a combination of fine and community service as determined by the court. A second or subsequent violation of this section shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or the person shall be required to perform not less than 36 hours or more than 48 hours of community service during hours when the person is not employed or is not
 attending school, or a combination of fine and community service, as the court deems just. It is the intent of the Legislature that the community service requirements prescribed in this section require service at an alcohol or drug treatment program or facility or at a county coroner’s office, if available, in the area where the violation occurred or where the person resides.

(b) The penalties imposed by this section do not preclude prosecution or the imposition of penalties under any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 505, Sec. 3.   (SB 485)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

25659.

For the purpose of preventing the violation of Section 25658, any licensee, or his or her agent or employee, may refuse to sell or serve alcoholic beverages to any person who is unable to produce adequate written evidence that he or she is over the age of 21 years. A licensee, or his or her agent or employee, may seize any identification presented by a person that shows the person to be under the age of 21 years or that is false, so long as a receipt is given to the person from whom the identification is seized and the seized identification is given within 24 hours of seizure to the local law enforcement agency that has jurisdiction over the licensed premises. A licensee, his or her agent or employees decision to not seize a license shall not create any civil or criminal liability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 565, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

25659.5.

(a) Retail licensees selling keg beer for consumption off licensed premises shall place an identification tag on all kegs of beer at the time of sale and shall require the signing of a receipt for the keg of beer by the purchaser in order to allow kegs to be traced if the contents are used in violation of this article. The keg identification shall be in the form of a numbered label prescribed and supplied by the department that identifies the seller. The receipt shall be on a form prescribed and supplied by the department and shall include the name and address of the purchaser and the purchaser’s driver’s license number or equivalent form of identification number. A retailer shall not return any deposit upon the return of any keg that does not have the identification label required
 pursuant to subdivision (a).

(b) Any licensee selling keg beer for off premise consumption who fails to require the signing of a receipt at the time of sale and fails to place a numbered identification label on the keg shall be subject to disciplinary action pursuant to this division. The licensee shall retain a copy of the receipt, which shall be retained on the licensed premise for a period of six months. The receipt records shall be available for inspection and copying by the department or other authorized law enforcement agency.

(c) Possession of a keg containing beer with knowledge that the keg is not identified as required by subdivision (a) is a misdemeanor.

(d) Any purchaser of keg beer who knowingly provides false information as required by subdivision (a) is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(e) The identification label required pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be constructed of material and made attachable in such a manner as to make the label easily removable for the purpose of cleaning and reusing the keg by a beer manufacturer.

(f) The department is authorized to charge fees for supplying receipt forms and identification labels pursuant to subdivision (a). The fees for receipt forms and identification labels shall be ten dollars ($10) and twenty-five dollars ($25), respectively, and may be adjusted by the department pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 23320. Fees collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited in the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund.

(g) As used in this section, “keg” means any brewery-sealed, individual container of beer having a liquid capacity of six gallons or
 more.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 71.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

25660.

(a) Bona fide evidence of majority and identity of the person is any of the following:

(1) A document issued by a federal, state, county, or municipal government, or subdivision or agency thereof, including, but not limited to, a valid motor vehicle operator’s license, that contains the name, date of birth, description, and picture of the person.

(2) A valid passport issued by the United States or by a foreign government.

(3) A valid identification card issued to a member of the Armed Forces that includes a date of birth and a picture of the person.

(b) (1) Proof that the defendant-licensee, or their employee or agent, demanded, was shown, and acted in reliance upon bona fide evidence, or utilized a biometric system, in any transaction, employment, use, or permission forbidden by Section 25658, 25663, or 25665 shall be a defense to any criminal prosecution therefor or to any proceedings for the suspension or revocation of any license based thereon.

(2) A biometric system utilized by a defendant-licensee shall be based upon a review of bona fide evidence of majority and identity of a person and that verifies and authenticates the validity of that bona fide evidence.

(3) The use of an active age verification software or an age verification
 device to establish the age of a purchaser of alcoholic beverages, that fails to identify a false identification card, shall be considered evidence in a criminal prosecution therefor, or to any proceedings for the suspension or revocation of any license based thereon, provided that the identification is bona fide evidence of majority and identity as described in subdivision (a) and was physically inspected, is seemingly legitimate, and matches the physical appearance of the customer.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Biometrics” means the unique characteristics of a person, including, but not limited to, fingerprints, iris, face, or other similar biometric characteristics, or any combination thereof.

(2) “Biometric system” means technology that links the identity of a person to that person’s biometrics.

(3) “Use of an active age verification software or an age verification device” means scanning the magnetic strip or the barcode on the bona fide evidence of majority and identity, as described in subdivision (a), to verify data on the identification document.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.   (AB 509)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

25660.5.

Any person who sells, gives, or furnishes to any person under the age of 21 years any false or fraudulent written, printed, or photostatic evidence of the majority and identity of such person or who sells, gives or furnishes to any person under the age of 21 years evidence of majority and identification of any other person is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

25661.

(a) Any person under 21 years of age who presents or offers to any licensee, or agent or employee of a licensee, any written, printed, or photostatic evidence of age and identity which is false, fraudulent or not actually their own for the purpose of ordering, purchasing, attempting to purchase or otherwise procuring or attempting to procure, the serving of any alcoholic beverage, or who possesses any false or fraudulent written, printed, or photostatic evidence of age and identity, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of at least two hundred fifty dollars ($250), no part of which shall be suspended; or the person shall be required to perform not less than 24 hours nor more than 32 hours of community service during hours when the person is not employed and is not
 attending school, or a combination of fine and community service as determined by the court. A second or subsequent violation of this section shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or the person shall be required to perform not less than 36 hours or more than 48 hours of community service during hours when the person is not employed or is not attending school, or a combination of fine and community service, as the court deems just. It is the intent of the Legislature that the community service requirements prescribed in this section require service at an alcohol or drug treatment program or facility or at a county coroner’s office, if available, in the area where the violation occurred or where the person resides.

(b) The penalties imposed by this section do not preclude prosecution or the imposition of penalties under any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 505, Sec. 4.   (SB 485)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

25662.

(a) Except as provided in Section 25667 or 25668, any person under 21 years of age who possesses any alcoholic beverage on any street or highway or in any public place or in any place open to the public is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) or the person shall be required to perform not less than 24 hours or more than 32 hours of community service during hours when the person is not employed or is not attending school. A second or subsequent violation shall be punishable as a misdemeanor and the person shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or required to perform not less than 36 hours or more than 48 hours of community service during hours when the person is not employed or is not attending school, or a combination of fine and community service as the
 court deems just. It is the intent of the Legislature that the community service requirements prescribed in this section require service at an alcohol or drug treatment program or facility or at a county coroner’s office, if available, in the area where the violation occurred or where the person resides. This section does not apply to possession by a person under 21 years of age making a delivery of an alcoholic beverage in pursuance of the order of a parent, responsible adult relative, or any other adult designated by the parent or legal guardian, or in pursuance of employment. That person shall have a complete defense if they were following, in a timely manner, the reasonable instructions of a parent, legal guardian, responsible adult relative, or adult designee relating to disposition of the alcoholic beverage.

(b) Unless otherwise provided by law, where a peace officer has lawfully entered the premises, the peace officer may seize any
 alcoholic beverage in plain view that is in the possession of, or provided to, a person under 21 years of age at social gatherings, when those gatherings are open to the public, 10 or more persons under 21 years of age are participating, persons under 21 years of age are consuming alcoholic beverages, and there is no supervision of the social gathering by a parent or guardian of one or more of the participants.

Where a peace officer has seized alcoholic beverages pursuant to this subdivision, the officer may destroy any alcoholic beverage contained in an opened container and in the possession of, or provided to, a person under 21 years of age, and, with respect to alcoholic beverages in unopened containers, the officer shall impound those beverages for a period not to exceed seven working days pending a request for the release of those beverages by a person 21 years of age or older who is the lawful owner or resident of the property upon which the alcoholic
 beverages were seized. If no one requests release of the seized alcoholic beverages within that period, those beverages may be destroyed.

(c) The penalties imposed by this section do not preclude prosecution or the imposition of penalties under any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 505, Sec. 5.   (SB 485)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

25663.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), no licensee that sells or serves alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises shall employ any person under 21 years of age for the purpose of preparing or serving alcoholic beverages. Every person who employs or uses the services of any person under the age of 21 years in or on that portion of any premises, during business hours, which are primarily designed and used for the sale and service of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Any off-sale licensee who employs or uses the services of any person under the age of 18 years for the sale of alcoholic beverages shall be subject to suspension or revocation of his or her license, except that a person under the age of 18 years may be employed or used for those purposes if that person is under the continuous supervision of a person 21 years of age or older.

(c) Any person between 18 and 21 years of age employed in any bona fide public eating place, as defined in Sections 23038 and 23038.1, which is licensed for the on-sale of alcoholic beverages, may serve alcoholic beverages to consumers only under the following circumstances: such service occurs in an area primarily designed and used for the sale and service of food for consumption on the premises; and the primary duties of the employee shall be the service of meals to guests, with the service of alcoholic beverages being incidental to such duties. For purposes of this subdivision, “serve” or “service” includes the delivery, presentation, opening, or pouring of an alcoholic beverage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 508, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

25663.5.

Notwithstanding Section 25663 or any other provision of law, persons 18 to 21 years of age may be employed as musicians, for entertainment purposes only, during business hours on premises which are primarily designed and used for the sale and service of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises, if live acts, demonstrations, or exhibitions which involve the exposure of the private parts or buttocks of any participant or the breasts of any female participant are not allowed on such premises. However, the area of such employment shall be limited to a portion of the premises that is restricted to the use exclusively of musicians or entertainers in the performance of their functions, and no alcoholic beverages shall be sold, served, consumed, or taken into that area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1761.)
-------------------------------------------

25664.

(a) (1) The use, in any advertisement of alcoholic beverages, of any subject matter, language, or slogan addressed to and intended to encourage minors to drink the alcoholic beverages, is prohibited.

(2) Signage or flyers advertising an establishment that serves alcoholic beverages to individuals under the age of 21 years are prohibited under paragraph (1) if one of the establishment’s principal business activities is the selling of alcoholic beverages, and the advertisement expressly states that the jurisdiction in which the establishment is located has a legal drinking age of under 21 years or that individuals under the age of 21 years may patronize the establishment.

(3) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to restrict or prohibit any advertisement of alcoholic beverages to those persons of legal drinking age.

(b) The department may adopt rules as it determines to be necessary for the administration of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 771, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

25665.

Any licensee under an on-sale license issued for public premises, as defined in Section 23039, who permits a person under the age of 21 years to enter and remain in the licensed premises without lawful business therein is guilty of a misdemeanor. Any person under the age of 21 years who enters and remains in the licensed public premises without lawful business therein is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than two hundred dollars ($200), no part of which shall be suspended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 65.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

25666.

(a) In a hearing on an accusation charging a licensee with a violation of Section 25658, the department shall produce the minor decoy alleged in the accusation for examination at the hearing unless the minor decoy is unavailable as a witness because they are dead or unable to attend the hearing because of a then-existing physical or mental illness or infirmity, or unless the licensee has waived, in writing, the appearance of the minor decoy. When a minor decoy is absent because of a then-existing physical or mental illness or infirmity, a reasonable continuance shall be granted to allow for the appearance of the minor decoy if the administrative law judge finds that it is reasonably likely that the minor decoy can be produced within a reasonable amount of time.

(b) (1) Nothing in this section shall prevent the department from taking testimony of the minor
 decoy as provided in Section 11511 of the Government Code.

(2) This section is not intended to preclude the continuance of a hearing because of the unavailability of a minor decoy for any other reason pursuant to Section 11524 of the Government Code.

(c) For purposes of this section, “minor decoy” means a person under 21 years of age used by peace officers in the enforcement of Section 25658 to apprehend licensees, or employees or agents of licensees, or other persons who sell or furnish alcoholic beverages to minors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 208, Sec. 1.   (AB 1275)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25666.5.

If a person is convicted of a violation of subdivision (b) of Section 25658, or Section 25658.5, 25661, or 25662 and is granted probation, the court may order, with the consent of the defendant, as a term and condition of probation, in addition to any other term and condition required or authorized by law, that the defendant participate in the program prescribed in Article 3 (commencing with Section 23509) of Chapter 12 of Division 11.5 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 118, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 85 of Ch. 118.)
-------------------------------------------

25667.

(a) Any person under the age of 21 years shall be immune from criminal prosecution under subdivision (a) of Section 25662 and subdivision (b) of Section 25658, where the person establishes all of the following:

(1) The underage person called 911 and reported that
 either himself or herself or another person was in need of medical assistance due to alcohol consumption.

(2) The underage person was the first person to make the 911 report.

(3) The underage person, who reported that another person was in need of medical assistance, remained on the scene with the other person until that medical assistance arrived and cooperated with medical assistance and law enforcement personnel on the scene.

(b) This section shall not provide immunity from criminal prosecution for any offense that involves activities made dangerous by the consumption of alcoholic beverages, including, but not limited to, a violation of Section 23103 of the Vehicle Code, as specified by Section 23103.5 of the Vehicle Code, or a violation of Sections 23152 and 23153 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 245, Sec. 3.   (AB 1999)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

25668.

(a) A qualified student may taste an alcoholic beverage, and both the student and the qualified academic institution in which the student is enrolled shall not be subject to criminal prosecution under subdivision (a) of Section 25658 and subdivision (a) of Section 25662, if all of the following criteria are met:

(1) The qualified student tastes the alcoholic beverage while enrolled in a qualified academic institution.

(2) The qualified academic institution has established an associate’s degree or bachelor’s degree program in any of the following:

(A) Hotel management.

(B) Culinary arts.

(C) Enology or brewing that is designed to train industry professionals in the production of wine or beer.

(3) The qualified student tastes the alcoholic beverage for educational purposes as part of the instruction in a course required for an associate’s degree or bachelor’s degree.

(4) The alcoholic beverage remains in the control of an authorized instructor of the qualified academic institution who is at least 21 years of age.

(b) This section shall not be construed to allow a student under 21 years of age to receive an alcoholic beverage unless it is delivered as part of the student’s curriculum requirements.

(c) A license or permit is not required to be
 held by a qualified academic institution engaging in the activities authorized by this section, provided an extra fee or charge is not imposed for the alcoholic beverages tasted.

(d) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Qualified academic institution” means a public college or university accredited by a commission recognized by the United States Department of Education.

(2) “Qualified student” means a student enrolled in a qualified academic institution who is at least 18 years of age.

(3) “Taste” means to draw an alcoholic beverage into the mouth, but does not include swallowing or otherwise consuming the alcoholic beverage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 20.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Responsible Beverage Service (RBS) Training Program Act of 2017 [25680. - 25686.]

25680.

For purposes of this article:

(a) “Alcohol server” means a person who serves alcoholic beverages for consumption, or a person who manages or supervises that person, on premises licensed to serve alcoholic beverages pursuant to this division, including a designee for alcoholic beverage sales and service pursuant to temporary license.

(b) “Alcohol
 server certification” means a certification issued by
 a training provider to a person who has successfully completed an RBS training course, as demonstrated by the passage of an exam.

(c) “RBS training course” means a course administered by a
 training provider that is designed to instruct and educate alcohol servers on responsible practices regarding the sale and service of alcoholic beverages that includes, but is not limited to, instruction on the following subjects:

(1) The social impact of alcohol.

(2) The impact of alcohol on the body.

(3) State laws and regulations relating to alcoholic beverage control, including laws and regulations related to driving under the influence.

(4) Intervention techniques to prevent the service or sale of alcoholic beverages to underage persons or intoxicated patrons.

(5) The
 development of management policies that support the prevention of service or sale of alcoholic beverages to underage persons or intoxicated patrons.

(d) “RBS training program” means a statewide Responsible Beverage Service training program administered or authorized by the department that provides RBS training courses to licensees and their agents and employees.

(e) “Training provider” means any of the following:

(1) A training provider accredited by an accreditation agency, provided that the accreditation agency is authorized by the department to accredit training providers offering RBS training courses. 

(2) A training provider approved by the department, pursuant to rules promulgated by the department pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 25681.

(3) The department when offering RBS training courses.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 847, Sec. 2.   (AB 1221)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

25681.

(a) The department shall develop, implement, and administer a curriculum for an RBS training program that will make RBS training courses available, both in person and online, to all persons required to obtain an alcohol server certification pursuant to this article. RBS training courses shall, at a minimum, be offered in English and Spanish.

(1) The department may be a provider of RBS training courses.

(2) The department shall authorize one or more accreditation agencies to accredit training providers to offer RBS training courses that meet the curriculum requirements established by the department. The department may collect fees to
 cover its reasonable costs for the review, approval, and renewal of the approval of accreditation agencies.

(3) An accredited training provider shall register with the department once accredited.

(b) (1) The department may approve training providers that are not accredited by an accreditation agency authorized by the department. The department shall promulgate regulations setting forth the requirements for approval for training providers that are not accredited. At a minimum, training providers that are not accredited shall:

(A) Possess background and expertise in the fields of alcohol, training, hospitality, and psychology.

(B) Keep records of all certifications issued and, upon request, make these available to the department or other law enforcement agencies.

(C) Provide technical support to servers and customers.

(D) Maintain strict data security protocols.

(E) Comply with any other requirements established by the department.

(2) The department may collect fees to cover its reasonable costs for the review, approval, and renewal of the approval of training providers that are not accredited by an accreditation agency.

(c) A training provider shall register with the department once accredited by an
 authorized accreditation agency or approved by the department.

(d) A training provider shall issue alcohol server certifications to persons who have successfully completed an RBS training course and passed an exam.

(e) An alcohol server certification shall be valid for a period of three years from the date of issuance and shall be valid for any person employed by a licensee that is subject to this article.

(f) (1) Commencing on or before January 1, 2027, the RBS training courses shall include all of the following:

(A) Best practices on how to prevent or protect a person from drink spiking.

(B) Best practices if the person believes they have, or someone they know has, been drugged as a result of drink spiking.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “drink spiking” means putting alcohol or drugs into another person’s drink without their knowing and express consent, also known as roofying.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 829, Sec. 1.   (AB 2402)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25682.

(a) Beginning July 1, 2022, a licensee that is subject to this article shall not employ or continue to employ any alcohol server without a valid alcohol server certification.

(1) An alcohol server who was employed by the licensee prior to July 1, 2022, shall obtain an alcohol server certification by August 31,
 2022.

(2) An alcohol server who is employed by the licensee on or after July 1, 2022, shall obtain an alcohol server certification within 60 calendar days of employment.

(b) (1) A licensee that is subject to this article shall ensure that each alcohol server it employs has a valid alcohol server certification. The licensee shall maintain records of certifications for inspection, upon request, by the department.

(2) Except for a violation of subdivision (c),
 it shall be a defense against any action for a violation of this article that the alcohol server was within 60 calendar days of initial employment or, with regard to employees employed prior to July 1, 2022, between July 1, 2022, and August 31, 2022, inclusive.

(c) A nonprofit organization that has obtained a temporary daily on-sale license or a temporary daily
 off-sale license from the department shall designate a person or persons to receive RBS training prior to the event, and that designated person or persons shall remain onsite for the duration of the event.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 14, Sec. 1.   (AB 82)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

25683.

A person shall not perform duties that include the sale or service of alcoholic beverages for consumption on licensed premises, and shall not manage that person, without a valid alcohol server certification.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 847, Sec. 2.   (AB 1221)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

25684.

The failure of a licensee to comply with this article shall be grounds for disciplinary action. A violation of this article shall not be grounds for any criminal action, pursuant to this division, against a licensee or an agent or employee of a licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 847, Sec. 2.   (AB 1221)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

25685.

(a) The department may adopt rules that it determines necessary for the administration of the provisions of this article.

(b) The department may charge fees as necessary to cover its reasonable costs for administering the program authorized by this article.

(c) The department may charge a fee, not to exceed five dollars ($5) per person, for administering the exam required for an alcohol server certification.

(d) If the department offers an RBS training course, the fee charged by the department for that course shall not exceed fifteen dollars ($15) per person.

(e) Any moneys
 collected under this article shall be deposited in the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 72.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

25686.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to expand the existing duties of a licensee in connection with the sale and service of alcoholic beverages. An alcohol server shall continue to be subject to subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 25602.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 847, Sec. 2.   (AB 1221)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Entertainment Zones [25690. - 25692.]

25690.

A city, county, or city and county that establishes an entertainment zone shall do both of the following:

(a) Establish a process or procedure by which persons in possession of alcoholic beverages in the entertainment zone may be readily identifiable as being 21 years of age or older.

(b) Upon establishing or modifying the entertainment zone, provide all of the following to the department:

(1) A copy of the ordinance establishing or modifying the entertainment zone.

(2) Information as may be necessary to identify the boundaries
 of the entertainment zone.

(3) The days and hours of operation of the entertainment zone.

(4) The types of alcoholic beverages permitted within the entertainment zone.

(5) The approved nonglass and nonmetal containers in which alcoholic beverages may be authorized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 869, Sec. 5.   (SB 969)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25691.

(a) An ordinance establishing or modifying an entertainment zone shall not authorize consumption of alcoholic beverages during the hours in which sales of alcoholic beverages are prohibited under Section 25631.

(b) An ordinance establishing or modifying an entertainment zone may only authorize consumption of alcoholic beverages during the hours in which at least one licensee within the boundaries of the entertainment zone is permitted to sell alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 869, Sec. 6.   (SB 969)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25692.

(a) Before enacting an ordinance to establish or modify an entertainment zone, a city, county, or city and county shall notify local law enforcement and request feedback about both of the following:

(1) Potential health and safety impacts that might be generated by the entertainment zone and strategies to mitigate those impacts.

(2) The entertainment zone’s proposed boundaries, days and hours of operation, types of alcoholic beverages permitted, and approved nonglass and nonmetal containers.

(b) A city, county, or city and county that establishes an entertainment
 zone, or its designated subordinate officer or body, shall review the operation of the entertainment zone every two years following the adoption of the entertainment zone to ensure that the entertainment zone is being maintained in a manner that protects the health and safety of the general public. This review shall be conducted in consultation with local law enforcement agencies and any reports produced during the review shall be made available to the department upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 869, Sec. 7.   (SB 969)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 17. Administrative Provisions [25750. - 25762.]

25750.

(a) The department shall make and prescribe those reasonable rules as may be necessary or proper to carry out the purposes and intent of Section 22 of Article XX of the California Constitution and to enable it to exercise the powers and perform the duties conferred upon it by that section or by this division, not inconsistent with any statute of this state, including particularly this division and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) Any regulation which excludes nude persons from licensed premises shall
 not apply to a nude person at licensed premises located at a nudist resort or nudist campground which was in existence prior to January 1, 1977, and whose operation is in conformance with local land use regulations.

(c) Subdivision (b) is applicable only in a county where the board of supervisors of the county in which the licensed premises is located adopts an ordinance or resolution making subdivision (b) applicable in that county, and the sheriff of that county certifies that no extraordinary police problem would be created thereby.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 636, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

25750.5.

(a) The Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control may permit licensees to exercise license privileges in an expanded license area authorized pursuant to a COVID-19 Temporary Catering Authorization approved in accordance with the Fourth Notice of Regulatory Relief issued by the department on May 15, 2020. A COVID-19 Temporary Catering Authorization authorizes the on-sale consumption of those alcoholic beverages for which the licensee has on-sale privileges on property that is adjacent to the licensed premises, within the control of the licensee.

(b) The COVID-19 Temporary Catering Authorization approved by the department shall be subject to terms and conditions established by the
 department and stated in the Fourth Notice of Regulatory Relief and the related application form, including, but not limited to, that the authorization may be canceled as determined by the department, as provided in the Fourth Notice, which includes, but is not limited to, upon objection by local law enforcement or if operation of the temporarily authorized area is inconsistent with state or local public health directives.
